cs: Barvení / zpracování barev: Gradient / ombré; Ručně barvené; Melírované; Barvené v kotli; Přirozeně zbarvené (barva plemene); Jednobarevně barvené; Sekčně barvené; Kropenaté; Nebarvené (bělené / bílé); Nebarvené (přírodní); Ostatní
sv: Färgning / färgbearbetning: Gradient/ombré; Handfärgad; Melerad; Grytfärgad; Naturfärgad (rasfärg); Enfärgad; Partifärgad; Spräcklig; Ofärgad (blekt/vit); Ofärgad (naturlig); Övrigt
ja: 染色／色加工: グラデーション / オンブレ; 手染め; 杢; ケトルダイ; ナチュラルカラー (品種の毛色); 単色染め; スペースダイ; スペックル; 無染色 (漂白 / 白); 無染色 (ナチュラル); その他
ko: 염색/색상 처리: 그라데이션/옴브레; 수작업 염색; 헤더; 케틀 다이; 천연 색상 (품종 색상); 단색 염색; 스페이스 다이; 스페클; 무염색 (표백/흰색); 무염색 (천연); 기타
nl: Verven / kleurverwerking: Kleurverloop / ombré; Handgeverfd; Gemêleerd; Ketelgeverfd; Natuurlijk gekleurd (raskleur); Effen geverfd; Space-dyed; Gespikkeld; Ongeverfd (gebleekt / wit); Ongeverfd (natuurlijk); Anders
it: Tintura / processo di colorazione: Gradiente / ombré; Tinto a mano; Mélange; Tinto in caldaia; Colorato naturale (colore della razza); Tinto a tinta unita; Tinto a tratti; Macchiettato; Non tinto (sbiancato / bianco); Non tinto (naturale); Altro
el: Βαφή / επεξεργασία χρώματος: Ντεγκραντέ / Όμπρε; Βαμμένο στο χέρι; Μελανζέ; Βαμμένο σε καζάνι; Φυσικού χρώματος (χρώμα ράτσας); Μονόχρωμη βαφή; Space-dyed; Με πιτσιλιές; Άβαφο (λευκασμένο / λευκό); Άβαφο (φυσικό); Άλλο
sl-SI: Barvanje/obdelava barv: Prelivajoče/ombré; Ročno barvano; Melirano; Kotlovsko barvano; Naravno barvano (barva pasme); Enobarvno; Prostorsko barvano; Pikčasto; Nebarvano (beljeno/belo); Nebarvano (naravno); Drugo
zh-CN: 染色固色处理: 渐变 / 渐层; 手工染色; 花纱混色; 缸染; 天然色（品种色）; 纯色染色; 段染; 斑点; 未染色（漂白 / 白色）; 未染色（自然色）; 其他
vi: Quá trình nhuộm/xử lý màu: Chuyển màu gradient / ombré; Nhuộm thủ công; Nhuộm màu xước; Nhuộm bồn nhỏ; Màu tự nhiên (màu giống); Nhuộm đơn sắc; Nhuộm loang (space-dyed); Lốm đốm; Không nhuộm (tẩy / trắng); Không nhuộm (tự nhiên); Khác
ro-RO: Vopsire/prelucrare culori: Degrade / Ombré; Vopsit manual; Melanj; Vopsit în cazan; Colorat natural (culoarea rasei); Vopsit uniform; Vopsit spațial; Pătat; Nevopsit (înălbit / alb); Nevopsit (natural); Altele
ru: Окрашивание/цветовая обработка: Градиент/омбре; Окрашено вручную; Меланж; Окрашивание в чане; Натуральный цвет (окрас породы); Однотонное окрашивание; Секционное окрашивание; В крапинку; Неокрашенная (отбеленная/белая); Неокрашенная (натуральная); Другое
hr-HR: Bojanje / obrada boja: Gradijent / ombré; Ručno bojano; Melirano; Bojano u kotlu; Prirodna boja (boja pasmine); Jednobojno bojano; Prostorno bojano; Pjegavo; Nebojano (izbijeljeno / bijelo); Nebojano (prirodno); Ostalo
lt-LT: Dažymas / spalvos apdorojimas: Gradientas / „Ombré“; Dažyta rankomis; Melanžo; Dažyta katile; Natūralios spalvos (veislės spalvos); Dažyta vienspalviai; Dažyta atkarpomis; Taškuota; Nedažyta (balinta / balta); Nedažyta (natūrali); Kita
sk-SK: Farbenie/spracovanie farieb: S prechodom / ombré; Ručne farbené; Melírované; Farbené v kotle; Prirodzene sfarbené (farba plemena); Farbené jednofarebne; Úsekovo farbené; Fŕkané; Nefarbené (bielené / biele); Nefarbené (prírodné); Iné
th: การย้อมสี /กระบวนการปรับแต่งสี: ไล่สี / ออมเบร; ย้อมด้วยมือ; สีผสม (Heathered); ย้อมต้ม; สีธรรมชาติ (สีตามสายพันธุ์); ย้อมสีพื้น; ย้อมเป็นช่วงสี; มีลายจุด; ไม่ย้อมสี (ฟอกสี / สีขาว); ไม่ย้อมสี (ธรรมชาติ); อื่นๆ
fr: Teinture ou procédé de coloration: Dégradé / Ombré; Teint à la main; Chiné; Teint en cuve; Couleur naturelle (couleur de la race); Teint de couleur unie; Teint par espacement; Tacheté; Non teint (blanchi / blanc); Non teint (naturel); Autre
da: Farvning/farvebehandling: Gradient / ombré; Håndfarvet; Meleret; Kettle-dyed; Naturligt farvet (racefarve); Ensfarvet; Space-dyed; Spættet; Ufarvet (bleget / hvid); Ufarvet (naturlig); Andet
tr: Boyama / renk işleme: Gradyan / ombre; El boyaması; Kırçıllı; Kazan boyaması; Doğal renkli (ırk rengi); Düz boyalı; Aralıklı boyalı; Benekli; Boyasız (ağartılmış / beyaz); Boyasız (doğal); Diğer
en: Dyeing / color processing: Gradient / Ombré; Hand-dyed; Heathered; Kettle-dyed; Natural colored (breed color); Solid dyed; Space-dyed; Speckled; Undyed (bleached / white); Undyed (natural); Other
fi: Värjäys/värikäsittely: Liukuvärjätty / Ombré; Käsinvärjätty; Meleerattu; Pata-värjätty; Luonnollisen värinen (rodun väri); Yksivärinen värjäys; Pätkävärjätty; Pilkullinen; Värjäämätön (valkaistu/valkoinen); Värjäämätön (luonnollinen); Muu
zh-TW: 染色/色彩處理: 漸層 / Ombré (漸層色); 手工染色; 混色; 鍋染; 天然原色 (品種本色); 單色染色; 段染; 斑點色; 未染色 (漂白 / 白色); 未染色 (自然色); 其他
de: Färbung/Farbverarbeitung: Farbverlauf / Ombré; Handgefärbt; Meliert; Kesselgefärbt; Naturfarben (Rassefarbe); Einfarbig; Space-Dyed; Gesprenkelt; Ungefärbt (gebleicht / Weiß); Ungefärbt (Natur); Sonstige
pl: Barwienie / obróbka kolorystyczna: Gradient / ombré; Ręcznie farbowane; Melanżowe; Farbowane w kotle; Naturalny kolor (odmiana rasy); Jednolicie farbowane; Farbowane przestrzennie (space-dyed); Nakrapiane; Niefarbowane (bielone / białe); Niefarbowane (naturalne); Inne
pt-PT: Tingimento/processamento de cor: Gradiente/ombré; Tingido à mão; Mesclado; Tingido em caldeira; Cor natural (cor da raça); Tingido numa só cor; Tingimento espaçado; Pintalgado; Não tingido (branqueado/branco); Sem tingimento (natural); Outro
hu: Festés / színezés: Színátmenetes / Ombre; Kézzel festett; Melírozott; Üstben festett; Természetes színű (fajtajelleg szerinti szín); Egyszínűre festett; Szakaszosan festett (space-dyed); Pettyes; Festetlen (fehérített / fehér); Festetlen (természetes); Egyéb
es: Teñido o procesamiento de color: Degradado / Ombré; Teñido a mano; Jaspeado; Teñido en olla; Color natural (color de raza); Teñido sólido; Teñido por secciones; Moteado; Sin teñir (blanqueado / blanco); Sin teñir (natural); Otro
nb: Farging/fargebehandling: Gradient / ombré; Håndfarget; Melert; Grytefarget; Naturfarget (rasefarge); Ensfarget; Seksjonsfarget; Spettet; Ufarget (bleket / hvit); Ufarget (naturlig); Annet
bg-BG: Боядисване / обработка на цвета: Градиент / Омбре; Ръчно боядисани; Меланж; Боядисани в казан; Естествен цвят (цвят на породата); Едноцветни; Секционно боядисани; На пръски; Небоядисани (избелени/бели); Небоядисани (естествени); Друго
pt-BR: Tingimento/processamento de cor: Gradiente/ombré; Tingido à mão; Matizado; Tingido em caldeira; Colorido natural (cor da raça); Tingido de forma sólida; Space-dyed; Salpicado; Não tingido (alvejado/branco); Não tingido (natural); Outro